Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
328L]

HAWAII
TOBACCO SETTLEMENT MONEYS

Section

328L-1 Definitions

328L-2 Hawaii tobacco settlement special fund

328L-3 Emergency and budget reserve fund

328L-4 Repealed

328L-5 Hawaii tobacco prevention and control
trust fund

328L-6 Tobacco prevention and control advisory
board

328L-7 Limitation on bond requirements in
litigation

involving master settlement agreement

signatories, successors, and affiliates

Cross References

Tobacco liability act, see chapter 675.

Tobacco products reporting, see chapter 486P.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next